Vermont, session 2025-2026, H97.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4004 is amended to read:
§ 4004. POSSESSION OF DANGEROUS OR DEADLY WEAPON IN A
SCHOOL BUS OR SCHOOL BUILDING OR ON SCHOOL
PROPERTY
(a) No person shall knowingly possess a firearm or a dangerous or deadly
weapon while within a school building or, on a school bus, or on any school
property. A person who violates this section shall, for the first offense, be
imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or
both, and for a second or subsequent offense shall be imprisoned for not more
than three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(b) No person shall knowingly possess a firearm or a dangerous or deadly
weapon on any school property with the intent to injure another person. A
person who violates this section shall, for the first offense, be imprisoned for
not more than three years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both, and for a
second or subsequent offense shall be imprisoned for not more than five years
or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. [Repealed.]
(c) This section shall not apply to:
(1) A law enforcement officer while engaged in law enforcement duties.
VT LEG #379637 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.97
2025 Page 3 of 4
(2) Possession and use of firearms or dangerous or deadly weapons if
the board of school directors, or the superintendent or principal if delegated
authority to do so by the board, authorizes possession or use for specific
occasions or for instructional or other specific purposes.
(3) Possession and use of firearms or dangerous or deadly weapons by a
person at a childcare facility that is located in the person’s residence.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “School property” means any property owned by a school, including
motor vehicles.
(2) “Owned by the school” means owned, leased, controlled, or
subcontracted by the school.
(3) “Dangerous or deadly weapon” shall have has the same meaning as
in section 4016 of this title.
(4) “Firearm” shall have has the same meaning as in section 4016 of this
title.
(5) “Law enforcement officer” shall have has the same meaning as in
section 4016 of this title.
(6) “School” includes:
(A) a prequalified private prekindergarten provider as defined in
16 V.S.A. § 829; and
(B) a childcare facility as defined in 33 V.S.A. § 511.
VT LEG #379637 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.97
2025 Page 4 of 4
(e) The provisions of this section shall not limit or restrict any prosecution
for any other offense, including simple assault or aggravated assault.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379637 v.1